Utah statutes.
32A-6-202 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Operational restrictions.
In addition to the restrictions, conditions, and requirements of Section
32A-6-105, each public service permit is subject to the following operating
restrictions:
(1) (a)  A public service permittee whose public conveyances operate on an
interstate basis may purchase alcoholic beverages outside of the state and
bring it into the state and sell and serve it to passengers traveling on the
permittee's public conveyance for consumption while en route on the
conveyance.
(b)  A public service permittee whose public conveyances operate solely within
the state shall purchase to sell and serve to passengers traveling on the
permittee's public conveyance for consumption while en route on the
conveyance:
(i)  liquor from state stores or package agencies; and
(ii)  beer from a local beer wholesaler.
(2)  A public service permittee may establish a hospitality room in which
alcoholic beverages may be stored, sold, served, and consumed, if:
(a)  the room is located within a depot, terminal, or similar facility
adjacent to and servicing the permittee's airline, railroad, bus, boat, or
other public conveyance;
(b)  the room is completely enclosed and the interior is not visible to the
public;
(c)  the sale or service of alcoholic beverages is made only to persons then
in transit using the host company's airline, railroad, bus line, or other
public conveyance, and holding a valid boarding pass or similar travel
document issued by the host company; and
(d) (i)  all liquor is purchased from:
(A)  a state store; or
(B)  a  package agency; and
(ii)  beer is purchased from a local licensed beer wholesaler.
(3)  Each public service permittee operating a hospitality room shall display
in a prominent place in the hospitality room, a sign in large letters stating:
"Warning: Driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs is a serious crime
that is prosecuted aggressively in Utah."
(4)  The operation of all hospitality rooms shall be done in accordance with
this chapter and rules adopted by the commission.
